Utah statutes.
31A-35-601.   Acts of producer or agent.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Bail recovery agent" means an individual employed by a bail enforcement agent to assist the bail enforcement agent regarding civil or criminal defendants released on bail by:

(i)  presenting a defendant for required court appearances;

(ii)  apprehending or surrendering a defendant to a court; or

(iii)  keeping the defendant under necessary surveillance.

(b)  "Bail recovery apprentice" means an individual who:

(i)  is employed by a bail enforcement agent; and

(ii)  works under the direct supervision of that bail enforcement agent or under the direct supervision of a bail recovery agent employed also by the bail enforcement agent, unless the bail recovery apprentice is conducting activities at the direction of the employing bail enforcement agent that do not require direct supervision.

(2)  The acts or conduct of any bail bond producer or bail enforcement agent, bail recovery agent, or bail recovery apprentice who acts within the scope of the authority delegated to him by the bail bond surety, are considered to be the acts or conduct of the bail bond surety for which the bail bond producer or bail bond enforcement agent, bail recovery agent, or bail recovery apprentice is acting as agent.

(3)  The acts or conduct of any bail bond producer or bail enforcement agent, bail recovery agent, or bail recovery apprentice who acts within the scope of the authority delegated to him by the bail bond producer are considered to be the acts or conduct of the bail bond producer for which the bail enforcement agent is acting as agent.



Amended by Chapter 298, 2003 General Session

